Wisconsin, session 2025, AB954.
do enact as follows:AB954,11Section 1. 165.83 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB954,2,32165.83 (2) (d) Obtain Except as provided in par. (dd), obtain and file 3information relating to identifiable stolen or lost property.AB954,24Section 2. 165.83 (2) (dd) of the statutes is created to read:AB954,2,105165.83 (2) (dd) 1. If a law enforcement agency forwards a file under s. 175.36 6(2) (a) 2. to the department, enter the information into the national crime 7information center systems and put the file in a database that is created for stolen 8or lost firearms and make the database available to law enforcement agencies for 9the purpose of locating and identifying stolen or lost firearms and identifying 10violators of s. 175.36 (1).AB954,2,14112. If a law enforcement agency notifies the department under s. 175.36 (2) (b) 12that a stolen or lost firearm has been recovered, enter that information into the 13national crime information center systems and add to the database a notation that 14the firearm has been recovered and the date on which it was recovered.AB954,315Section 3. 175.36 of the statutes is created to read:AB954,2,1916175.36 Reporting stolen or lost firearm. (1) (a) A person who owns a 17firearm and who discovers that the firearm is stolen or lost shall, within 24 hours of 18the discovery, report the theft or loss to a law enforcement agency that has 19jurisdiction over the area in which the firearm was stolen or lost.AB954,3,220(b) If a person who has reported a theft or loss under par. (a) recovers the 1firearm, the person shall report as soon as practicable to a law enforcement agency 2the date on which the firearm was recovered.AB954,3,43(2) (a) A law enforcement agency that receives under sub. (1) (a) a report of a 4stolen or lost firearm shall do all of the following:AB954,3,951. Create a file that includes, if known, the date on which the firearm was 6stolen or lost; the caliber, make, and model of the firearm; the serial number of the 7firearm; any distinguishing mark on the firearm; and the location at which the 8firearm was purchased by, or transferred to, the person making the report under 9sub. (1) (a).AB954,3,11102. As soon as practicable, forward a copy of the file created under subd. 1. to 11the department of justice for inclusion in a database under s. 165.83 (2) (dd).AB954,3,1412(b) A law enforcement agency that receives under sub. (1) (b) a report of a 13recovered firearm shall report to the department of justice the date on which the 14firearm was recovered.AB954,3,1615(3) A person who reports under sub. (1) (a) a stolen or lost firearm, when he or 16she knows that the report is false, is guilty of violating s. 946.41.AB954,3,1717(4) A person who violates sub. (1) (a) is guilty of one of the following:AB954,3,1818(a) For a first offense, a Class A misdemeanor.AB954,3,1919(b) For a 2nd or subsequent offense, a Class I felony.AB954,420Section 4. 175.37 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB954,3,2221175.37 (title) Warning Requirements whenever transferring a 22firearm.AB954,523Section 5. 175.37 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB954,4,31175.37 (1m) Upon the retail commercial sale or transfer of a firearm, the 2seller or transferor shall provide to the buyer or transferee a written notice of the 3requirements under s. 175.36 (1) and of the penalties under s. 175.36 (4).AB954,64Section 6. 175.37 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB954,4,65175.37 (2) Any person who violates sub. (1) or (1m) may be fined not more 6than $500 or imprisoned for not more than 30 days or both.AB954,77Section 7. Initial applicability.AB954,4,98(1) Lost or stolen firearms. The treatment of s. 175.36 (1) (a) first applies 9to discoveries of stolen or lost firearms made on the effective date of this subsection.AB954,4,1210(2) Requirements when transferring firearm. The treatment of s. 175.37 11(1m) first applies to sales and transfers that occur on the effective date of this 12subsection.AB954,4,1313